Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4405
Vaccination; domestic animals exempt.

(1) The provisions of sections 71-4401 to 71-4412 with respect to vaccination shall not apply to any domestic or hybrid animal owned by a person temporarily remaining within the State of Nebraska for less than thirty days, to any domestic or hybrid animal brought into the State of Nebraska for field trial or show purposes, or to any domestic or hybrid animal brought into the state for hunting purposes for a period of less than thirty days. Such domestic or hybrid animals shall be kept under strict supervision of the owner. It shall be unlawful to bring any domestic or hybrid animal into the State of Nebraska which does not comply with the animal health laws and import rules and regulations of the State of Nebraska which are applicable to domestic or hybrid animals.

(2) Domestic or hybrid animals assigned to a research institution or a similar facility shall be exempt from sections 71-4401 to 71-4412.

Laws 1969, c. 445, § 5, p. 1486;

Laws 1987, LB 104, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB25, § 7.